Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201644-408
Life insurance companies; ascertainment
of condition; assets and liabilities; what considered.

In
ascertaining the condition of any life insurance company, it shall be allowed
as assets only such investments, cash, and accounts as are authorized by the
laws of this state or
of the state or country in which it is organized at the date of examination.
There shall be charged against it as liabilities in addition to the capital
stock, all outstanding indebtedness of the company, and the premium reserve
on policies and additions thereto in force, computed according to the tables
of mortality and rate of interest prescribed in sections 44-402.01 to
44-407.09.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 95, p. 439;

R.S.1913, § 3232;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. VI, § 3, p. 619;

C.S.1922, § 7831;

C.S.1929, § 44-503;

R.S.1943, § 44-408;

Laws 1965, c. 262, § 11, p. 742;

Laws 2014, LB755, § 17.